Washington statutes.
RCW 25.05.170

Actions by partnership and partners.

(1) A partnership may maintain an action against a partner for a breach of the partnership agreement, or for the violation of a duty to the partnership, causing harm to the partnership.

(2) A partner may maintain an action against the partnership or another partner for legal or equitable relief, with or without an accounting as to partnership business, to:

(a) Enforce the partner's rights under the partnership agreement;

(b) Enforce the partner's rights under this chapter, including:

(i) The partner's rights under RCW 25.05.150, 25.05.160, or 25.05.165;

(ii) The partner's right on dissociation to have the partner's interest in the partnership purchased pursuant to RCW 25.05.250 or enforce any other right under article 6 or 7 of this chapter; or

(iii) The partner's right to compel a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under RCW 25.05.300 or enforce any other right under article 8 of this chapter; or

(c) Enforce the rights and otherwise protect the interests of the partner, including rights and interests arising independently of the partnership relationship.

(3) The accrual of, and any time limitation on, a right of action for a remedy under this section is governed by other law. A right to an accounting upon a dissolution and winding up does not revive a claim barred by law.

[ 1998 c 103 s 405.]